Florida, session 2026, SB10.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 266 267 Section 1.âThe facts stated in the preamble to this act are 268 found and declared to be true. 269 Section 2.âThe Legislature acknowledges that the stateâs 270 system of justice yielded an imperfect result in this case and 271 that former Broward County Sheriffâs Deputy Maury Hernandez 272 should be granted relief for the injuries and damages he 273 suffered while in the line of duty as a consequence of the 274 Department of Correctionsâ failure to enforce probation 275 regulations and policies then in place, in violation of state 276 law. 277 Section 3.âThe sum of $5 million is appropriated from the 278 General Revenue Fund to the Department of Corrections for the 279 relief of Maury Hernandez for injuries and damages sustained. 280 Section 4.âThe Chief Financial Officer is directed to draw 281 a warrant in favor of Maury Hernandez in the amount of $5 282 million upon funds of the Department of Corrections in the State 283 Treasury, and the Chief Financial Officer is directed to pay the 284 same out of such funds in the State Treasury. 285 Section 5.âIt is the intent of the Legislature that any 286 lien interests held by the state arising from the treatment and 287 care of Maury Hernandez for the occurrences described in this 288 act be waived. 289 Section 6.âThe amount awarded under this act is intended to 290 provide the sole compensation for all present and future claims 291 arising out of the factual situation described in this act. The 292 total amount paid for attorney fees relating to this claim may 293 not exceed 25 percent of the amount awarded under this act. 294 Section 7.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.